Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202525-1645
Act; intent and purpose.

The Legislature hereby declares that it is the intent and purpose of the Jury Selection Act to create a jury system which will ensure that:

(1) All persons selected for jury service are selected at random from a fair cross section of the population of the area served by the court;

(2) All qualified citizens have the opportunity to be considered for jury service;

(3) All qualified citizens fulfill their obligation to serve as jurors when summoned for that purpose; and

(4) No citizen is excluded from jury service in this state as a result of discrimination based upon race, color, religion, sex, national origin, economic status, or military or veteran status.

Laws 1979, LB 234, § 1;

R.S.1943, (2016), § 25-1601.03;

Laws 2020, LB387, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 23.